Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.320

Interagency disputes—Alternative dispute resolution—Definitions. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

For purposes of RCW 43.17.320 through 43.17.340, "state agency" means:

(1) Any agency for which the executive officer is listed in RCW 42.17A.705(1); and

(2) The office of the secretary of state; the office of the state treasurer; the office of the state auditor; the department of natural resources; the office of the insurance commissioner; and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2011 c 60 s 35; 1993 c 279 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

Intent—1993 c 279: "It is the intent of the legislature to reduce the number of time-consuming and costly lawsuits between state agencies by establishing alternative dispute resolution processes available to any agency." [ 1993 c 279 s 1.]

PDFRCW 43.17.320

Interagency disputes—Alternative dispute resolution—Definitions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

For purposes of RCW 43.17.320 through 43.17.340, "state agency" means:

(1) Any agency for which the executive officer is listed in RCW 29B.55.020(1); and

(2) The office of the secretary of state; the office of the state treasurer; the office of the state auditor; the department of natural resources; the office of the insurance commissioner; and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2024 c 164 s 521; 2011 c 60 s 35; 1993 c 279 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Intent—1993 c 279: "It is the intent of the legislature to reduce the number of time-consuming and costly lawsuits between state agencies by establishing alternative dispute resolution processes available to any agency." [ 1993 c 279 s 1.]